District of Columbia statutes.
16-4204

Waiver and preclusion of privilege.

(a)

A privilege under § 16-4203 may be waived in a record or orally during a proceeding if it is expressly waived by all parties to the mediation and:

(1)

In the case of the privilege of a mediator, it is expressly waived by the mediator; and

(2)

In the case of the privilege of a nonparty participant, it is expressly waived by the nonparty participant.

(b)

A person that discloses or makes a representation about a mediation communication which prejudices another person in a proceeding is precluded from asserting a privilege under § 16-4203, but only to the extent necessary for the person prejudiced to respond to the representation or disclosure.

(c)

A person that intentionally uses a mediation to plan, attempt to commit, or commit a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal activity, is precluded from asserting a privilege under § 16-4203.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Mediation Act.
This section is referenced in § 16-4203 and § 16-4210.